District of Columbia statutes.
28:11-108

Presumption that rule of law continues unchanged.

Unless a change in law has clearly been made, the provisions of this act shall be deemed declaratory of the meaning of the Uniform Commercial Code, effective January 1, 1965.

Mar. 16, 1982, D.C. Law 4-85, § 40, 29 DCR 309
1981 Ed., § 28:11-108.
“This act”, referred to in this section, is D.C. Law 4-85.